Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-319
Lake, pond, or stream closed to fishing; notice.

If the commission desires to close to the taking of fish by any means, any lake, pond, or stream or designated portion thereof frequented by fish, or any lake, pond, or stream or designated portion thereof which it has stocked with fish, it shall cause notice thereof to be posted in at least two places on such lake, pond, or stream. Such notice shall designate as nearly as practicable the lake, pond, or stream or designated portion to be closed and shall state that on and after a date stated in the notice it shall be unlawful to take fish in such lake, pond, or stream.

Laws 1929, c. 112, IV, § 5, p. 422;

C.S.1929, § 37-405;

Laws 1933, c. 70, § 1, p. 309;

Laws 1941, c. 72, § 5, p. 303;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 37-405;

R.S.1943, § 37-405;

Laws 1957, c. 139, § 11, p. 470;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-405;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 77.